Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References. Compensation and benefits, §21-5-101 et seq.

Retirement, §24-1-101 et seq.

Veterans preferences, §21-3-301 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1917, No. 154, § 3: Mar. 1, 1917.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 247, § 26: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1993, No. 860, § 38: Apr. 2, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that payees listed in this Act may be entitled to the sums appropriated and transferred to herein, and that they have been deprived of the use of these funds for a long period of time, and that further delay in paying these just debts of the State would do harm to the reputation of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

21-1-101. Computation of length of service.

In computing or granting pensions, retirement pay, eligibility lists based on length of service, or any other right under a civil service or merit system in which length of service is the criterion, time spent by any employee, as defined in subsection (b) of this section, in the United States Armed Forces from September 16, 1940, until December 31, 1946, shall be counted as though the employee had remained continuously in the employment of the agency, department, or office.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any employee of any agency, department, or office supported in whole or in part with tax funds by the State of Arkansas or any county or municipality thereof, whose personnel are regulated by civil service or merit system adopted pursuant to an act of the General Assembly, or the governing body of any county or municipality with the following restrictions:

The employee must have been employed under the civil service or merit system at the time of his or her separation to enter the United States Armed Forces; and

The employee must have entered the United States Armed Forces directly after leaving the employment of the agency, department, or office and must have returned thereto within ninety (90) days after separation from the United States Armed Forces.

This section requires that time spent in the armed services should be considered for seniority purposes. Smith v. Little Rock Civil Serv. Comm'n, 214 Ark. 765, 218 S.W.2d 366 (1949).

However, in the case of a special election to fill an unexpired term, or to fill an office created after the last preceding general election, the term of the officer so elected shall begin as soon after the election as the result can be ascertained and the person elected can be commissioned and qualified.

Publisher's Notes. This section, as it applied to justices of the peace, was repealed by Acts 1933, No. 103, which was subsequently repealed by Acts 1937, No. 353, § 3.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted “Commissioner of State Lands” following “office of the” in (a)(1); inserted (a)(2) and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly; and made a related change.

Cross References. Continuance in office until successor elected, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 5.

Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 37 (repealed, now see Ark. Const. Amend. 56) did not amend by implication the provisions of Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 3, relating to the election and commencement of term of certain named executive officers so that it applied to the Commissioner of State Lands, and the commencement of the term of the Commissioner was governed by the provisions of this section even after the adoption of Ark. Const. Amend. 37 (repealed). Rankin v. Jones, 224 Ark. 1001, 278 S.W.2d 646 (1955).

The term of office of a constable begins on January 1 following his or her election. Hutcheson v. Pitts, 170 Ark. 248, 278 S.W. 639 (1926).

Supreme Court Justice, having been duly elected by the people of Arkansas and having begun her eight-year term as a justice on the Arkansas Supreme Court on January 1, 2015, was the qualified justice invested with the judicial power to participate in Case No. CV-14-427; a Special Justice's constitutional authority to participate in Case No. CV-14-427 expired December 31, 2014.Smith v. Wright, 2015 Ark. 189, 461 S.W.3d 687 (2015).

The awards shall be made upon attainment of ten (10), twenty (20), and thirty (30) years of service in state government.

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall promulgate reasonable rules as he or she deems necessary in carrying out the provisions of this service recognition program.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §§21-1-103 and21-5-105, concerning the service recognition program, are deemed to be superseded by this section. Former §§21-1-103 and21-5-105 were derived from Acts 1985, No. 762, § 18, and Acts 1987, No. 1051, § 21, respectively.

This section was also formerly codified as §21-5-105 which was transferred by Acts 1991, No. 786, § 34, to §21-1-103.

Acts 1991, No. 786, § 37, provided:

“The enactment and adoption of this Act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the 78th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” in (d).

The Office of Personnel Management and the Employee Benefits Division shall assist each state agency, board, commission, and institution of higher education in developing an employee benefits program and employee benefits statement.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2001, No. 1818, § 1, subsection (a) began:

“Beginning January 1, 2002,”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (e).

“Prohibit” means to interfere with the physical operation of a recording device by threat, duress, coercion, direct order, arrest, detention, or use of force.

“Prohibit” does not include instances when there is no interference with the operation of the recording device or the person who operates it; and

“Recording device” means a device that captures and records data or information, including without limitation a film camera, digital camera, tape recorder, or electronic sound recorder.

Prohibit a person from using a recording device carried on or near the person in a place that is open to and accessible to the general public or any private property where the person is lawfully present unless the act of recording or the location of the recording person:

Presents a risk to the physical safety of anyone present, not including the person making the recording;

Is inside a public drinking water treatment facility and presents a risk to the public drinking water treatment facility;

Constitutes an element of a criminal offense;

Could reasonably be expected to lead to the infringement of copyrighted material;

Appears to circumvent established procedures that ordinarily require permission for or payment in exchange for the viewing, use, reproduction, or recordation of data or information; or

Unreasonably obstructs or inhibits another person's lawful presence or movement;

Delete any electronic data or any other information derived by recording from a recording device carried on or near the person against the wishes of the person possessing the recording device or otherwise destroy information contained in the recording device unless the data are considered contraband; or

Seize or confiscate a recording device carried on or near the person using the recording device unless the recording device appears to be involved in the commission of a crime or unless the seizure is otherwise justified by an exigent circumstance.

If a person uses a recording device to intrude upon the seclusion or solitude of another person or upon the other person's private affairs or concerns, this subsection does not apply if the intrusion:

Violates a reasonable expectation of privacy; and

Would be highly offensive to a reasonable person.

(1)A violation of this section constitutes a waiving of the sovereign immunity of the state.

A court construing this section shall do so consistently with official capacity claims under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution filed through 42 U.S.C. § 1983 and the Arkansas Civil Rights Act of 1993, § 16-123-101 et seq.

Punitive damages are not provided under this section.

When a party sues for relief under this section or any other applicable law, the party shall only receive a single remedy for a single injury.

This section does not:

Imply any kind of right or power of a person to use devices to change the light levels of his or her surroundings, including without limitation umbrellas, reflectors, lights, or flashes;

Change, diminish, or denigrate the inherent or constitutional powers of the courts to issue binding orders or to regulate the absence, presence, or conduct of citizens occupying buildings or real property under the jurisdiction of the courts; or

Apply to the grounds of a hospital or other medical facility governed by the privacy regulations promulgated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191.

A state agency may adopt policies to limit or prohibit the use of recording devices by that state agency's employees or contractors in the course and scope of their employment if those policies are intended to comply with the requirements of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, or the requirements of other state or federal privacy laws.

U.S. Code. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936, referred to in this section, is codified throughout Titles 18, 26, 29 and 42 of the U.S. Code.

Cross References. Atheists, qualification for office, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 1.

Conviction of embezzlement, bar to holding office, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 9.

Conviction of felony, bar to holding office, Ark. Const., Art. 3, § 6.

Governor, Lieutenant Governor, acting Governor, ineligibility for appointed office, Ark. Const. Amend. 29, § 2.

Holding of more than one office prohibited, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 6.

Military officers, school officers, public notaries, permitted to hold office, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 26.

Qualification as elector required, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 3.

Religion no bar to holding office, Ark. Const., Art. 2, § 26.

Residence requirement, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 4.

Senators, representatives, barred from holding office, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 10.

Effective Dates. Acts 1921, No. 59, § 3: approved Feb. 3, 1921. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the same shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Am. Jur. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Pub. Off., § 48 et seq.

C.J.S. 67 C.J.S., Officers, § 21 et seq.

Cited: King v. Consolidated Freightways Corp., 763 F. Supp. 1014 (W.D. Ark. 1991).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning ineligibility of defaulters for office, lists of indebted persons, statement of default on certificate of election, withholding of commission or credentials of defaulter elected to office and the office subsequently being deemed vacant, and failure of officer to comply with §§21-1-201 —21-1-205, were repealed by Acts 1993, No. 1279, § 1. The sections were derived from the following sources:

21-1-202. Rev. Stat., ch. 47, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 3435; Pope's Dig., § 4278; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-103.

21-1-203. Rev. Stat., ch. 47, §§ 2, 4; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3436, 3438; Pope's Dig., §§ 4279, 4281; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-104, 12-106.

21-1-204. Rev. Stat., ch. 47, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 3437; Pope's Dig., § 4280; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-105.

21-1-205. Rev. Stat., ch. 47, §§ 5-8; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3439-3442; Pope's Dig., §§ 4282-4285; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-107 — 12-110.

21-1-206. Rev. Stat., ch. 47, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 3443; Pope's Dig., § 4286; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-111.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 56, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2323 — 12-2325.

21-1-102. Term of office of certain officers.

(1)The terms of office of the Justices of the Supreme Court, all district officers, except state senators, all county officers, except members of the lower house of the General Assembly, and all township officers and road overseers, when road overseers are elected, shall begin on January 1 following their election.

The term of office of the Commissioner of State Lands shall begin on the same date as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 3, for other constitutional officers.

All officers shall hold their respective offices for the term prescribed by the law and until their successors are elected and qualified.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 154, § 1, p. 809; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8071, 8072; Pope's Dig., §§ 10400, 10401; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-112; Acts 2009, No. 646, § 1.

21-1-103. Service recognition program.

There is established a method of recognition of service by employees of the State of Arkansas.

The Office of Personnel Management shall coordinate the purchase, distribution, and presentation of service awards based on years of service with the State of Arkansas for full-time employees in all state agencies, boards, commissions, and others under the Governor's direction.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 247, § 19; 1991, No. 786, § 34; 2019, No. 315, § 2313; 2019, No. 910, § 6119.

21-1-104. Limitation on judicial employment — State employee.

No state employee shall serve both in a full-time quasi judicial position, or in a full-time position which provides legal assistance to a quasi judicial position, in the Arkansas State Claims Commission, Arkansas Public Service Commission, Workers' Compensation Commission, State Department for Social Security Administration Disability Determination, or any other quasi judicial agency, department, or commission and as an elected judge.

For purposes of this section, the term “state employee” shall mean anyone who works one thousand (1,000) hours or more per year and participates in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 860, § 29.

21-1-105. Employee benefit programs.

Each state agency, board, commission, and institution of higher education shall develop an informational program explaining the various fringe benefit programs that are provided for employees or in which employees may participate.

Each state agency, board, commission, and institution of higher education shall provide each employee with this fringe benefit program information upon the initial employment of an employee at a new employee orientation meeting.

(1)The program shall include information about the employee's:

Health and life insurance programs;

Social Security benefits;

Retirement system benefits;

Workers' compensation benefits; and

Employee assistance programs.

The program may include information on other optional programs available to employees, such as deferred compensation plans, credit unions, or similar kinds of programs available for employees.

Each state agency, board, commission, and institution of higher education shall provide each employee with an annual employee benefits statement, which shall summarize the status of the benefit plans in which the employee participates.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1818, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6120.

21-1-106. Public recording and deletion of electronic data — Definitions.

As used in this section:

(1)A public officer or employee shall not:

A public officer or employee who violates this section may only be sued in his or her official capacity.

A publicly funded school or publicly funded institution of higher education is exempt from this section.

Nothing in this section is intended to change, diminish, or denigrate the powers of those who rightfully control private property to regulate, place conditions on, or prohibit recording activities that take place on that private property.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1063, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Eligibility for Office

21-1-201. Gender not a bar to holding office.

Gender shall not be a bar to the holding of any public or civil office in this state.

Women, where otherwise qualified, shall be entitled to hold public or civil office, whether elective or appointive, under the Arkansas Constitution and statutes of this state.

History.

Acts 1921, No. 59, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 10436, 10437; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-101, 12-102.

21-1-202 — 21-1-206. [Repealed.]

No employee of the state, a county, a municipality, a school district, or any other political subdivision of this state shall be deprived of his or her right to run as a candidate for an elective office or to express his or her opinion as a citizen on political subjects, unless as necessary to meet the requirements of federal law as pertains to employees.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1214, § 1.

Cross References. Certain political activity prohibited, §20-76-207.

Limitation of political activity by officer or employee, §20-79-212.

Participation in political activities, §14-52-306.

Political activity prohibited, §§14-49-306,14-50-306.

Subchapter 3

— Emergency Interim Executive and Judicial Succession Act

Effective Dates. Acts 1961, No. 489, § 14: Jan. 1, 1962.

21-1-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Emergency Interim Executive and Judicial Succession Act”.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-114.

21-1-302. Legislative intent.

Because of the existing possibility of attack of unprecedented size and destructiveness upon the United States, and in order, in the event of such an attack, to assure continuity of government through legally constituted leadership, authority, and responsibility in offices of the government of the state and its political subdivisions, to provide for the effective operation of governments during an emergency, and to facilitate the early resumption of functions temporarily suspended, it is found and declared to be necessary to provide for:

Additional officers who can exercise the powers and discharge the duties of Governor;

Emergency interim succession to governmental offices of this state and its political subdivisions in the event the incumbents thereof and their deputies, assistants, or other subordinate officers authorized, pursuant to law, to exercise all of the powers and discharge the duties of those offices who are in this subchapter referred to as “deputies” are unavailable to perform the duties and functions of those offices; and

Special emergency judges who can exercise the powers and discharge the duties of judicial offices in the event regular judges are unavailable.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-115.

21-1-303. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Attack” means any attack or series of attacks by an enemy of the United States causing, or which may cause, substantial damage or injury to civilian property or persons in the United States in any manner by sabotage or by the use of bombs, missiles, shellfire, or atomic, radiological, chemical, bacteriological, or biological means or other weapons or processes;

“Emergency interim successor” means a person designated pursuant to this subchapter, in the event the officer is unavailable, to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office until a successor is appointed or elected and qualified as may be provided by the Arkansas Constitution, statutes, charters, and ordinances or until the lawful incumbent is able to resume the exercise of the powers and discharge the duties of the office;

“Office” includes all state and local offices, the powers and duties of which are defined by the Arkansas Constitution, statutes, charters, and ordinances, except the Office of Governor, and except those in the General Assembly and the judiciary;

“Political subdivision” includes counties, cities, towns, villages, townships, districts, authorities, and other public corporations and entities whether organized and existing under charter or general law; and

“Unavailable” means either that a vacancy in office exists and there is no deputy authorized to exercise all of the powers and discharge the duties of the office or that the lawful incumbent of the office, including any deputy exercising the powers and discharging the duties of an office because of a vacancy, and his or her duly authorized deputy are absent or unable to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-116.

21-1-304. Additional successors to Office of Governor.

In the event that the Governor, for any of the reasons specified in the Arkansas Constitution, is not able to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of his or her office, or is unavailable, and in the event the Lieutenant Governor, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives are not able, for any of the reasons specified in the Arkansas Constitution, to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the Office of Governor, or are unavailable, then the Attorney General, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, or Commissioner of State Lands, in the order named, shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the Office of Governor until a new Governor is elected and qualified, or until one (1) of the officers who precedes him or her in the order of succession becomes available.

However, no emergency interim successor to the offices mentioned in subsection (a) of this section may serve as Governor.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “Auditor of State, or Commissioner of State Lands” in (a).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning emergency interim successors for state officers, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 380, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1961, No. 489, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-118.

The special emergency judges shall, in the order specified, exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office in case of the unavailability of the regular judge or judges or persons immediately preceding them in the designation.

The special emergency judges shall discharge the duties and exercise the powers of the office until such time as a vacancy which may exist shall be filled in accordance with the Arkansas Constitution and statutes or until the regular judge or one preceding the designee in the order of succession becomes available to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-117; Acts 2017, No. 380, § 1.

21-1-305. [Repealed.]

(1)With respect to local offices for which the legislative bodies of cities, towns, villages, townships, and counties may enact resolutions or ordinances relative to the manner in which vacancies will be filled or temporary appointments to office made, the legislative bodies are authorized to enact resolutions or ordinances providing for emergency interim successors to offices of those governmental units.

The resolutions and ordinances shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter.

(1)The provisions of this subsection shall be applicable to officers of political subdivisions including, but not limited to, cities, towns, villages, townships, and counties, as well as school, fire, power, and drainage districts not included in subsection (a) of this section.

(A)The officers, subject to any regulations which the executive head of the political subdivision may issue, shall designate by title, if feasible, or by named person, emergency interim successors and specify their order of succession.

The officer shall review and revise, as necessary, designations made pursuant to this subchapter to ensure their current status.

The officer will designate a sufficient number of persons so that there will be not less than three (3) nor more than seven (7) deputies or emergency interim successors or any combination thereof, at any time.

(A)In the event that any officer of any political subdivision or his or her deputy provided for pursuant to law is unavailable, the powers of the office shall be exercised, and the duties shall be discharged, by his or her designated emergency interim successors in the order specified.

The emergency interim successor shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office to which designated until such time as a vacancy which may exist shall be filled in accordance with the Arkansas Constitution or statutes or until the officer, or his or her deputy or a preceding emergency interim successor, again becomes available to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of his or her office.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-119, 12-120.

21-1-307. Special emergency judges.

In the event that any judge of any court is unavailable to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of his or her office and in the event no other judge authorized to act in the event of absence, disability, or vacancy or no special judge appointed in accordance with the provisions of the Arkansas Constitution or statutes is available to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office, the duties of the office shall be discharged and the powers exercised by the special emergency judges provided for in this section.

(1)The Governor shall designate, for each member of the Supreme Court, special emergency justices in the number of not less than three (3) nor more than seven (7) for each member of the court and shall specify the order of their succession.

For each court of record except the Supreme Court, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court in consultation with the other members of the court shall designate special emergency judges in the number of not less than three (3) nor more than seven (7) for each judge of the courts and shall specify the order of their succession.

The judge of the circuit court shall designate not less than three (3) special emergency judges for courts not of record within that circuit and shall specify their order of succession.

The designating authority shall review and revise, as necessary, designations made pursuant to this subchapter to ensure their current status.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-121.

21-1-308. Formalities of taking office.

At the time of their designation, emergency interim successors and special emergency judges shall take any oath which may be required for them to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office to which they may succeed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person, as a prerequisite to the exercise of the powers or discharge of the duties of an office to which he or she succeeds, shall be required to comply with any other provision of law relative to taking office.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-122.

21-1-309. Period in which authority may be exercised.

Officials authorized to act as Governor pursuant to this subchapter, emergency interim successors, and special emergency judges are empowered to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office as authorized in this subchapter only after an attack upon the United States, as defined in this subchapter, has occurred.

At any time, the General Assembly by concurrent resolution may terminate the authority of emergency interim successors and special emergency judges to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of office as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-123.

21-1-310. Removal of designees.

Until such time as the persons designated as emergency interim successors or special emergency judges are authorized to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office in accordance with this subchapter, including §21-1-309, those persons shall serve in their designated capacities at the pleasure of the designating authority and may be removed or replaced by the designating authority at any time, with or without cause.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-124.

21-1-311. Disputes.

Any dispute concerning a question of fact arising under this subchapter with respect to an office in the executive branch of the state government, except a dispute of fact relative to the Office of Governor, shall be adjudicated by the Governor or other official authorized under the Arkansas Constitution and this subchapter to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the Office of Governor, and his or her decision shall be final.

History.

Acts 1961, No. 489, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-125.

Subchapter 4

— Constitutional Officers and Their Spouses

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 34, § 12: Feb. 9, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an immediate need to establish restrictions and procedures regarding constitutional officers becoming employees of the state or entering into grants, contracts or leases with the state; that this act establishes those restrictions and procedures; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible to help restore the public confidence in state government. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 16: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, at the 2014 General Election, which added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to enforce Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 and issue guidance to affected public officials; and that the additional provisions of this act provide clarity to the ethics laws of the State of Arkansas and should become effective at the earliest opportunity to prevent confusion and avoid incorrect applications of the state's ethics laws. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 661, § 4: Apr. 2, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act establishes certain employment restrictions on former members of the General Assembly that are in the best interests of the state; and that these restrictions should become effective at the earliest opportunity to provide for the full implementation of the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

21-1-401. Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter:

“Constitutional officer” means Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State, Attorney General, Commissioner of State Lands, Auditor of State, member of the Arkansas House of Representatives, and member of the Arkansas Senate; and

“State agency” means every board, commission, department, division, institution, and other office of state government whether located within the legislative, executive, or judicial branch of government and including state-supported colleges and universities.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 34, § 1.